Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.095

Authority of secretary.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary may:

(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish forms necessary to administer this chapter;

(3) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the education, training, and examination requirements for licensure and deny a license to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications for licensure. Proceedings concerning the denial of licenses based on unprofessional conduct or impaired practice shall be governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(4) Employ clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement and administer this chapter and hire individuals, including those licensed under this chapter, to serve as examiners or consultants as necessary to implement and administer this chapter;

(5) Maintain the official departmental record of all applicants and licensees;

(6) Determine the minimum education and experience requirements for licensure, including but not limited to approval of educational programs;

(7) Prepare and administer or approve the preparation and administration of examinations for licensure; and

(8) Establish and implement by rule a continuing competency program.

[ 1991 c 180 s 8.]